Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB377.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13(a) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended by adding a clause and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 13. Prohibited Acts; Penalties.--(a) The following acts and the causing thereof within the Commonwealth are hereby prohibited:* * *(41) The manufacture, delivery or possession with intent to 12345678910111213141516171819202122 manufacture or deliver tianeptine or any salt, compound, derivative or preparation of tianeptine by a person not registered under this act or by a practitioner not registered or licensed by the appropriate State board.* * *(f.1) Any person who knowingly or intentionally violates clause (41) of subsection (a) is guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be sentenced to imprisonment not exceeding five years, or to pay a fine not exceeding fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or both.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0377PN0333 - 2 - 123456789101112